District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

11-2306

Further investigation; autopsy.

Repealed.

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 519, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 111
June 13, 1994, Pub. L. 103-266, §§ 1(b)(104), (105), 108 Stat. 713
Nov. 22, 2000, 114 Stat. 2440, Pub. L. 106-522, § 148(a)
1981 Ed., § 11-2306.
1973 Ed., § 11-2306.